Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-24] Cultivation of medical marijuana
by qualifying patients and primary caregivers. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed as prohibiting a qualifying patient or primary caregiver
from cultivating or possessing an adequate supply of medical marijuana pursuant
to part IX of chapter 329. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next